New York, session 2025-2026, S749.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The subdivision heading and paragraph c of subdivision 5-b 2 of section 378 of the executive law, as amended by a chapter of the laws 3 of 2024 amending the executive law relating to requiring the installa- 4 tion of smoke detectors in common places of certain dwellings, as 5 proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 3249-B and A. 5730-B, are 6 amended to read as follows: 7 Standards for installation of [single station] smoke detecting alarm 8 devices requiring that: 9 c. every [multiple-family dwelling, except for a property owned or 10 operated by a public housing authority subject to federal safety and 11 inspection standards pursuant to title twenty-four of the code of feder- 12 al regulations, and every dwelling accommodation located in a building 13 owned as a condominium or cooperative in the state used as a residence,] 14 residential building with a common space or common spaces shared between 15 three or more dwelling units shall have installed an operable [single 16 station] smoke detecting alarm device [or], devices [in an area so], 17 system or systems such that [it] an alarm notification is clearly audi- 18 ble in each common space, with rules to be promulgated by the council in EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02706-01-5 S. 749 2 1 accordance with nationally recognized standards. [For purposes of this 2 subdivision, common space means a space] The council shall define common 3 spaces for the purposes of the standards promulgated pursuant to this 4 paragraph, provided that such definition shall include any spaces acces- 5 sible by all residents, including, but not limited to, [a lobby] 6 lobbies, [a hallway] hallways, and [a stairwell] stairwells, 7 § 2. Section 2 of a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the executive 8 law relating to requiring the installation of smoke detectors in common 9 places of certain dwellings, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 10 3249-B and A. 5730-B, is amended to read as follows: 11 § 2. This act shall take effect [immediately] December 31, 2025. 12 Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule 13 or regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on its effec- 14 tive date are authorized to be made and completed on or before such 15 effective date. 16 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 17 section one of this act shall take effect on the same date and in the 18 same manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the executive law 19 relating to requiring the installation of smoke detectors in common 20 places of certain dwellings, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 21 3249-B and A. 5730-B, takes effect.